Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 8

Habeas Corpus

33-3-801. Right to file for writ of habeas corpus.

Any person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability in a public or private residential facility for persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability is entitled to file for a writ of habeas corpus upon petition by the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability or a friend to any court generally empowered to issue the writ of habeas corpus in the county in which the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability is detained.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-3-802. Determination of mental condition of person seeking release.

During any proceeding to determine whether to release a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or intellectual disability seeking release by means of a writ of habeas corpus under this part or § 33-3-101, or otherwise, the court shall also, if the issue is raised in the responsive pleading, determine whether the person seeking release presently has mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or intellectual disability and meets the standards for involuntary commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, or §§ 33-5-402 and 33-5-403.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 21; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-3-803. Disposition of case.

If the court determines that the person was not admitted or committed under the governing provisions of this title or was not afforded due process of law, but that the person has a mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or intellectual disability and because of the condition poses a likelihood of serious harm to the person or others as determined under § 33-6-501, the court may order the person returned to the hospital or developmental center where the person was located on the date of filing the petition for not more than fifteen (15) days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays or holidays, if, and only if, a petition under §§ 33-5-402 and 33-5-403, or chapter 6, part 5 of this title is filed immediately and is disposed of within fifteen (15) days of the court's order, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays or holidays, unless the case is continued on request of petitioner; otherwise the person shall be released.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 22; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-3-804. Order of discharge.

If the court ordering the discharge is not the court that ordered the commitment or admission, the court shall transmit a certified copy of the order to the court that ordered the commitment or admission. Upon receipt of the copy, the court that ordered the commitment or admission shall enter an order finding that the person has been discharged by order of the court that issued the writ of habeas corpus.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.